Alaska statutes. Title 31. Oil and Gas.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 31.25.250.
Limitation on personal liability.

A member of the board or other officer of the corporation or a subsidiary of the corporation is not subject to personal liability or accountability because the member or officer executed or issued an obligation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.260.
Tax exemption.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter is, in all respects, for the benefit of the people of the state, for their well-being and prosperity, and for the improvement of their social and economic conditions, and the corporation is not required to pay a tax or assessment on any property owned by the corporation under the provisions of this chapter or on the income from it, including state taxes levied or authorized under AS

43.56.010(a)

and municipal taxes under AS

43.56.010(b)

as provided in AS

43.56.020

.

All obligations issued under this chapter are declared to be issued by a body corporate and public of the state and for an essential public and governmental purpose, and the obligations, and the interest and income on and from the obligations, and all fees, charges, funds, revenue, income, and other money pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of the obligations, or interest on the obligations, are exempt from taxation except for transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.270.
Annual report; final report.

The corporation shall prepare and transmit annually a report to the governor accounting for the efficient discharge of all responsibility assigned by law or by directive to the corporation. The corporation shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

By January 10 of each year, the board shall prepare a report of the corporation. The board shall notify the governor and the legislature that the report is available, and publish notice to the public on the Alaska Online Public Notice System under AS

44.62.175

that the report is available on the corporation’s Internet website. The report shall be written in easily understandable language. The report must include a financial statement audited by an independent outside auditor and any other information the board believes would be of interest to the governor, the legislature, and the public. The annual income statement and balance sheet of the corporation shall be published on the Internet. The board may also publish electronically or in print, at the corporation’s discretion, other reports it considers desirable to carry out its purpose.

After a decision of the corporation to dissolve under AS

31.25.010

, the corporation shall provide a final report to the governor, the legislature, and the public that summarizes the reasons for the dissolution of the corporation and a statement by an independent outside auditor that the corporation and the subsidiaries of the corporation, if any, have no bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 31.25.390.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning,

“Alaska liquefied natural gas project” means a natural gas project as described in AS

31.25.005

(5) that includes collectively, the Prudhoe Bay unit gas transmission line, the Point Thomson unit gas transmission line, a gas pipeline, the gas treatment plant, a liquefied natural gas plant, and a marine terminal; in this paragraph,

“gas pipeline”

means the main natural gas pipeline from the outlet flange of the gas treatment plant on the North Slope to the inlet flange of the liquefied natural gas plant located in the Southcentral region of the state, which shall have offtake points along the pipeline for deliveries of gas in the state;

does not include any gas lines downstream of any offtake point between the gas treatment plant and the liquefied natural gas plant;

“gas treatment plant” means those facilities and related activities required to receive natural gas from the Prudhoe Bay unit gas transmission line, the Point Thomson unit gas transmission line, and other facilities, treat the natural gas to pipeline specifications, dispose of or deliver by-products, deliver liquid products for further transportation, and deliver treated natural gas for transportation through the gas pipeline;

“liquefied natural gas plant” means the facility for liquefying natural gas and includes structures, equipment, underlying land rights, other associated systems, storage, and facilities for off-loading liquefied natural gas;

“marine terminal” means the terminal and those facilities required to receive liquefied natural gas from the boundary of the liquefied natural gas plant for marine transportation, including auxiliary vessels used in the operation of the terminal;

“Point Thomson unit gas transmission line” means a natural gas transmission line from the outlet flange of the Point Thomson unit production facility to the inlet flange of the gas treatment plant; and

“Prudhoe Bay unit gas transmission line” means a natural gas transmission line from the outlet flange of the Prudhoe Bay unit central gas facility to the inlet flange of the gas treatment plant;

“board” means the board of directors of the corporation;

“bond” or “obligation” means a bond, bond anticipation note, or other note of the corporation authorized to be issued by the corporation under this chapter;

“corporation” means the Alaska Gasline Development Corporation;

“governmental agency” means a department, division, public agency, political subdivision, or other public instrumentality of the state or the federal government;

“in-state natural gas pipeline” means a natural gas pipeline for transporting natural gas in the state;

“natural gas pipeline” means a total system of pipe and connected facilities for the transportation, treatment or conditioning, delivery, storage, or further transportation of natural gas, including all pipe, compressor stations, station equipment, and all other facilities used or necessary for an integral line of pipe to carry out the transportation of the natural gas.

History.

(§ 3 ch 11 SLA 2013; am § 21 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (1) was enacted as paragraph (7); renumbered in 2014, at which time former paragraphs (1) — (6) were renumbered as (2) — (7).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective May 9, 2014, added (7) [now (1)].